North Dakota, session 69, SB2195.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATIVE ASSEMBLY OF NORTH DAKOTA:
SECTION 1. AMENDMENT. Subsection 2 of section 19-03.1-22.1 of the North Dakota
Century Code is amended and reenacted as follows:
2. This section does not apply to inhalations specifically prescribed for medical, dental, or
optometric treatment purposes or to controlled substances described in this chapter.
For the purposes of this section, "volatile chemical" includes the following chemicals or
their isomers:
a. Acetone.
b. Aliphatic hydrocarbons.
c. Amyl nitrite.
d. Butane.
e. Butyl nitrite.
f. Carbon tetrachloride.
g. Chlorinated hydrocarbons.
h. Chlorofluorocarbons.
i. Chloroform.
j. Cyclohexane.
k. Diethyl ether.
Page No. 1 25.1022.02000

Sixty-ninth
Legislative Assembly
l. Difluoroethane.
m. Ethyl acetate.
m.n. Fluorocarbon.
n.o. Glycol ether inter solvent.
o.p. Glycol ether solvent.
p.q. Hexane.
q.r. Ketone solvent.
r.s. Methanol.
s.t. Methyl cellosolve acetate.
t.u. Methyl ethyl ketone.
u.v, Methyl isobutyl ketone.
v.w. Nitrous oxide.
w.x. Petroleum distillate.
x.y. Toluene.
y.z. Trichloroethane.
z.aa. Trichloroethylene.
aa.bb. Xylol or xylene.
SECTION 2. A new section to chapter 19-21 of the North Dakota Century Code is created
and enacted as follows:
Difluoroethane - Requirements for retail sale - Labeling .
1. For purposes of this section:
a. "Aerosol duster" means a product containing an aerosol propellant that may be
used to clean electronics.
b. "Behind the counter" means a product placed behind a counter or other barrier,
or in a locked cabinet, where a purchaser does not have direct access before
sale.
c. "Proof of age" means a document issued by a governmental agency which
contains a description of the individual or a photograph of the individual, or both,
and gives the individual's date of birth. The term includes a passport, military
identification card, or driver's license.
2. A retailer may sell an aerosol duster that contains 1,1 - difluoroethane only :
Page No. 2 25.1022.02000

Sixty-ninth
Legislative Assembly
a. From behind the counter;
b. To a purchaser verified to be at least twenty - one years of age, with proof of age ;
and
c. In a quantity of no more than four cans in a single transaction .
3. The department shall adopt labeling requirements for products containing
1,1 - difluoroethane to protect the health and safety of the public .
Page No. 3 25.1022.02000